tests/ky-nounsspecial.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../kir.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kir.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[lexc] Pronoun cases and stuff":
    бири-бир<prn><recip><nom> : бири-бир
    бири-бир<prn><recip><px3sg><nom> : бири-бири
    бири-бир<prn><recip><px3sg><gen> : бири-биринин
    бири-бир<prn><recip><px1pl><dat> : бири-бирибизге

  "[twol] Nouns with epenthetic vowels":
    орун<n><nom> : орун
    орун<n><loc> : орунда
    орун<n><px1sg><nom> : ордум
    орун<n><px1sg><loc> : ордумда
    орун<n><pl><nom> : орундар
    орун<n><px3sp><abl> : ордунан

  "[twol] Nouns with epenthetic vowels and й":
    моюн<n><px3sp><dat> : мойнуна

  "[twol] Nouns with epenthetic vowels and desonorisation":
    мурун<n><px3sp><dat> : мурдуна

  "[twol] Nouns with certain clusters analysed normally":
    факт<n><nom> : факт
    акт<n><abl> : акттан
    акт<n><gen> : акттын
    акт<n><pl><nom> : акттар
    акт<n><px3sp><gen> : актынын
    акт<n><px3sp><loc> : актында
    Омск<np><top><nom> : Омск
    Омск<np><top><abl> : Омсктон
    Омск<np><top><gen> : Омсктун
    Омск<np><top><pl><nom> : Омсктор
    Омск<np><top><px3sp><gen> : Омскунун
    Омск<np><top><px3sp><loc> : Омскунда


  "[twol] Nouns with certain clusters generated with extra и":
    факт<n><abl> : фактиден
    факт<n><gen> : фактинин
    факт<n><pl><nom> : фактилер
    факт<n><px3sp><gen> : фактисинин
    факт<n><px3sp><loc> : фактисинде
    Минск<np><top><nom> : Минск
    Минск<np><top><abl> : Минскиден
    Минск<np><top><gen> : Минскинин
    Минск<np><top><pl><nom> : Минскилер
    Минск<np><top><px3sp><gen> : Минскисинин
    Минск<np><top><px3sp><loc> : Минскисинде
